Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1605.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of economic security; area agencies on aging The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security to distribute to area agencies on aging for the following purposes: 1. $5,000,000 for home and community-based services. 2. $5,000,000 for senior housing assistance.